Alaska, session 34, SB288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 42.45.260(d) is amended to read: 05 (d) Loans made from the bulk fuel loan account to one borrower 06 (1) may not exceed $1,500,000 [$750,000] or, if the borrower is a 07 cooperative corporation organized under AS 10.15 or an electric cooperative 08 organized under AS 10.25 and uses the loan to purchase bulk fuel on behalf of more 09 than one community, may not exceed $1,500,000 [$750,000] multiplied by the number 10 of communities on whose behalf the bulk fuel is to be purchased [OR $1,800,000, 11 WHICHEVER IS LESS]; 12 (2) shall be repaid within one year after the date of the loan 13 disbursement; and 14 (3) may include additional terms and conditions required by the 01 division. 02 * Sec. 2. AS 42.45.270(c) is amended to read: 03 (c) Loans made from the bulk fuel bridge loan account to one borrower in a 04 fiscal year 05 (1) may not exceed $1,500,000 [$750,000]; 06 (2) shall be repaid within one year after the date of the loan 07 disbursement; and 08 (3) may include additional terms and conditions required by the 09 division. 10 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 11 read: 12 APPLICABILITY. AS 42.45.260(d), as amended by sec. 1 of this Act, and 13 AS 42.45.270(c), as amended by sec. 2 of this Act, apply to loans existing on or entered into 14 on or after the effective date of this Act. 15 * Sec. 4. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.